District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0563.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,Thatthis
act maybe cited as the“Preatrest Diversion Task Force Recommendations Congressional
Review Emergency AmendmentAct of2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 1507of the Criminal JusticeCoordinating Council forthe District of
ColumbiaEstablishment Act of2001, effectiveJune 8, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-175; D.C. Official
Code § 22-4237), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection(g) is amended by strikingthephrase “Within3 months after
the applicabilitydateofsection 29 ofthe Secure DCOmnibus Amendment Act of2024, passed
on 2nd reading on March 5, 2024 EnrolledversionofBill 25-345),” and inserting thephrase
“No laterthan June 2025,”in its place.
(b) Subsection (h) is amended by strikingthephrase “Within one year after
the applicabilitydateofsection 29ofthe Secure DC Omnibus Amendment Act of2024, passed
on 2nd readingonMarch 5, 2024 (Enrolled versionofBill 25-345),” and inserting thephrase
“No later thanJuly 31, 2026,”in its place.
Sec. 3, Title 20 oftheDistrictofColumbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 20-323(a) is amended by striking thephrase“legal periodicalof general
circulationin the District” and insertingthephrase “legal periodical ornewspaper ofgeneral
circulation in the District”in its place.

ENROLLED ORIGINAL,
(b) Section 20-343(a) is amended by strikingthephrase “legal periodicalofgeneral
circulation in the District” and insertingthephrase “legal periodical or newspaper ofgeneral
circulationin the District” in its place.
(©) Section 20-704(a) is amended by strikingthe phrase “legal periodicalofgeneral
circulation in the District”and inserting thephrase “legal periodical or newspaper ofgeneral
circulationin the District”in its place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impactstatement.
‘The Council adoptsthe fiscal impact statementofthe Budget Directorasthefiscal impact
statement required by section 4aofthe General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
‘This actshall take effectfollowingapproval by theMayor (or inthe event ofveto by the
Mayor, actionby the Council to override theveto), and shall remain ineffect forno longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency actsofthe Councilofthe District ofColumbia insection
412(a) ofthe District ofColumbia Home RuleAct, approvedDecember24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
Council oftheDistrict ofColumbia.
APPROVED
January 27,2026

COUNCILOF THE DISTRICTOFCOLUMBIA
WASHINGTON, DG, 20004
[]ITEMONCONSENTCALENDAR,
[XTACTION FinalReading,CC
[DqVOTEDATE January6,2026
DxvoicevoTe Approved
RECORDEDVOTEONREQUEST
ABSENT
[JROLLCALLVOTE~Result
WE A
ChairmanMendelson) X
Allen
Bonds
Felder
Frumin
a : aT ea
CERTIFICATION RECORD
scm10iCouncil ~ Date